Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.8 Water Projects Revolving Loan Fund
46-12.8-10.
Trust agreements pertaining to local governmental obligations.

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this chapter may be secured by one or more trust agreements, including, or in addition to the applicable loan agreement, between the local governmental unit and a corporate trustee, which may be a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state, or directly between the agency and the local governmental unit. Any trust agreement shall be in such form and shall be executed as provided in the applicable loan agreement or as otherwise agreed to between the agency and the local governmental unit.

Any trust agreement directly or indirectly securing local governmental obligations may, in addition to other security provided by law, pledge or assign, and create security interests in, all or any part of the general revenues of the local governmental unit. Any trust agreement may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security, and remedies of the agency, or other holders of the local governmental obligations, as may be determined by the agency including, without limitation, provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies in the event thereof, which may include the acceleration of maturities, and covenants setting forth the duties of, and limitations on, the local governmental unit in relation to the custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of moneys, including general revenues and drinking water system revenues, the issue of additional and refunding local governmental obligations and other bonds, notes, or other obligations on a parity or superior thereto, the establishment of reserves, the establishment of sinking funds for the payment of local governmental obligations, and the use of surplus proceeds of local governmental obligations. A trust agreement securing local governmental obligations issued in accordance with §

46-12.8-9

may also include covenants and provisions not in violation of law regarding the acquisition, construction, operation, and carrying out of the approved project financed by the obligations, the drinking water system of which it is a part, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive drinking water system revenues, the fixing and collection of drinking water system revenues, and the making and amending of contracts relating thereto.

In addition to other security provided herein or otherwise by law, any local governmental obligations issued under authority of this chapter may be secured, in whole or in part, by insurance or by letters or lines of credit or other credit facilities issued by any insurance company, bank, trust company, or other financial institution, within or without the state, and a local governmental unit may pledge or assign any of its general revenues or drinking water system revenues, as appropriate, as security for the reimbursement to the issuers of insurance, letters or lines of credit or other credit facilities of any payments made thereunder.

Any trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the agency or other holders of the local governmental obligations secured thereby and of any trustee or other fiduciary thereunder.

In addition to any other remedies provided under the applicable loan agreement or otherwise by law, the agency and any other holder of local governmental obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter, and any trustee under any trust agreement securing the obligations may bring suit in the superior court upon the local governmental obligations, and may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding for legal or equitable relief, including, in the case of local governmental obligations issued in accordance with §

46-12.8-9

, proceedings for the appointment of a receiver to take possession and control of the approved project financed thereby, the drinking water system of which it is a part, or any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive drinking water system revenues, to operate and maintain the system or facility in compliance with law, to make any necessary repairs, renewals, and replacements and to fix, revise, and collect drinking water system revenues, protect, and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted in this chapter or under any trust agreement, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter, the loan agreement, the applicable bond act, or the trust agreement to be performed by the local governmental unit or any officer thereof.

A pledge of general revenues or drinking water system revenues in accordance with this chapter shall constitute a sufficient appropriation thereof for the purposes of any provision for appropriation for so long as the pledge shall be in effect, and, notwithstanding any general or special law or municipal charter to the contrary, the revenues shall be applied as required by the pledge and the trust agreement evidencing the revenues without further appropriation.

A pledge or assignment of general revenues, other than drinking water system revenues, may be made only to secure general obligations of a local governmental unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-11.
Bonds of the agency.

The agency may provide by resolution of the board of directors for the issuance, from time to time, of bonds, notes or any other evidences of indebtedness of the agency for any of its corporate purposes or for the borrowing of money in anticipation of the issuance of the bonds. Bonds issued by the agency may be issued as general obligations of the agency or as special obligations payable solely from particular revenues or funds as may be provided for in any trust agreement or other agreement securing bonds. The agency may also provide by resolution of the board of directors for the issuance, from time to time, of temporary notes in anticipation of the revenues to be collected or received by the agency, including, without limitation, in anticipation of any payments to the agency from the state, or in anticipation of the receipt of other grants or aid. The issue of notes shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of bonds of the agency other than temporary notes as this chapter may be applicable; provided, however, that notes issued in anticipation of revenues shall mature no later than one year from their respective dates, or the date of expected receipt of the revenues, if later, and notes issued in anticipation of grants, or other aid and renewals thereof, shall mature no later than six (6) months after the expected date of receipt of the grant or aid.

The bonds of each issue shall be dated, may bear interest at such rate or rates, including rates variable from time to time as determined by such index, banker’s loan rate, or other method determined by the agency, and shall mature or otherwise be payable at such time or times, as may be determined by the agency, and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the agency or the holder thereof at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the agency. The agency shall determine the form of bonds, and the manner of execution of the bonds, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds, and the place or places of payment of principal, redemption premium, if any, and interest, which may be paid at any bank or trust company within or without the state. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds shall cease to be the officer before the delivery thereof, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the officer had remained in office until delivery. The agency may provide for authentication of bonds by a trustee, fiscal agent, registrar, or transfer agency. Bonds may be issued in bearer or in registered form, or both, and if notes, may be made payable to the bearer or to order, as the agency may determine. The agency may also establish and maintain a system of registration for any bonds whereby the name of the registered owner, the rights evidenced by the bonds, the transfer of the bonds, and the rights and other similar matters, are recorded in books or other records maintained by or on behalf of the agency, and no instrument evidencing the bonds or rights need be delivered to the registered owner by the agency. A copy of the books or other records of the agency pertaining to any bond registered under a registration system certified by an authorized officer of the agency or by the agent of the agency maintaining the system shall be admissible in any proceeding without further authentication. The board of directors may by resolution delegate to any member or officer of the agency, or any combination thereof, the power to determine any of the matters set forth in this section. In the discretion of the agency, bonds of the agency may be issued with such terms as will cause the interest thereon to be subject to federal income taxation. The agency may sell its bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, for the price, at the rate or rates of interest, or at discount in lieu of interest, as it may determine will best affect the purposes of this chapter.

The agency may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, exchangeable for definitive bonds, when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The agency may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall have become mutilated or shall have been destroyed or lost. The agency, by itself or through such agency as it may select, may purchase and invite offers to tender for purchase any bonds of the agency at any time outstanding; provided, however, that no purchase by the agency shall be made at a price, exclusive of accrued interest, if any, exceeding the principal amount thereof or, if greater, the redemption price of the bonds when next redeemable at the option of the agency, and may resell any bonds so purchased in such manner and for such price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.

In the discretion of the board of directors, any bonds issued hereunder may be secured by a trust agreement in such form and executed in such manner as may be determined by the board of directors, between the agency and the purchasers or holders of the bonds, or between the agency and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. The trust agreement may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, any loan agreements and local governmental obligations, and the revenues, funds, and other assets or property held or to be received by the agency, including without limitation all moneys and investments on deposit from time to time in the safe drinking water revolving loan fund, and any contract or other rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into existence and whether then held or thereafter acquired by the agency, and the proceeds thereof. The trust agreement may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security, and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies in the event thereof which may include the acceleration of maturities, restrictions on the individual right of action by bondholders, and covenants setting forth the duties of and limitations on the agency in relation to the custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of moneys, the enforcement of loan agreements and local governmental obligations, the issue of additional or refunding bonds, the fixing, revision, charging, and collection of charges, the use of any surplus bond proceeds, the establishment of reserves, and the making and amending of contracts.

In the discretion of the board of directors, any bond issued under authority of this chapter may be issued by the agency in the form of lines of credit or other banking arrangements under terms and conditions, not inconsistent with this chapter, and under such agreements with the purchasers or makers thereof or any agent or other representative of such purchasers or makers, as the board of directors may determine to be in the best interest of the agency. In addition to other security provided herein or otherwise by law, bonds issued by the agency under any provision of this chapter may be secured, in whole or in part, by financial guarantees, by insurance, or by letters or lines of credit issued to the agency or a trustee or any other person, by any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company, or other financial institution, within or without the state, and the agency may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, any loan agreements and any local governmental obligations or obligations of any privately organized water supplier, and the revenues, funds, and other assets and property held or to be received by the agency, and any contract or other rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into existence and whether then held or thereafter acquired by the agency, and the proceeds thereof, as security for the guarantees or insurance or for the reimbursement by the agency to any issuer of the line or letter of credit.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company to act as a depository or trustee of the proceeds of bonds, revenues, or other moneys under a trust agreement of the agency, and to furnish indemnification and to provide security as may be required by the agency. It is hereby declared that any pledge or assignment made by the agency under this chapter is an exercise of the governmental powers of the agency, and loan agreements, local governmental obligations, the obligations of private water companies, revenues, funds, assets, property, and contract or other rights to receive the same and the proceeds thereof, which are subject to the lien of a pledge or assignment created under this chapter, shall not be applied to any purposes not permitted by the pledge or assignment.

Any holder of a bond issued by the agency under the provisions of this chapter and any trustee or other representative under a trust agreement securing the trustee or representative, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the trust agreement, may bring suit upon the bonds in the superior court and may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding for legal or equitable relief, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder or under the trust agreement, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the trust agreement, to be performed by the agency or by any officer thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-12.
Refunding bonds.

The agency may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any of its bonds issued pursuant to this chapter at or prior to maturity or upon acceleration or redemption or purchase and retirement. Refunding bonds may be issued at such times at or prior to the maturity, redemption, or purchase and retirement of the refunded bonds as the board of directors deems to be in the interest of the agency. Refunding bonds may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide for payment of the principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium thereon, any interest or discount accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of the bonds, the costs of issuance of the refunding bonds, the expenses of paying, redeeming, or purchasing the bonds being refunded, the costs of holding and investing proceeds of refunding bonds pending payment, redemption, or purchase and reserves for debt service or other expenses from the proceeds of refunding bonds as may be required by a trust agreement securing the bonds. Pending application, the proceeds of the refunding bonds may be placed in escrow. The issue and sale of refunding bonds, the maturities, and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the agency in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as this chapter may be applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-13.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by the agency under this chapter and local governmental obligations issued hereunder are hereby made securities in which all public officers and agencies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies in their commercial departments, savings banks, cooperative banks, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds and local governmental obligations are hereby made securities which may properly be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer of any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state or any political subdivision is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 44.

46-12.8-14.
No additional consent required.

Except as provided in this section, bonds of the agency, local governmental obligations and obligations of private water companies may be issued under this chapter without obtaining the consent of any executive office, department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state or any political subdivision thereof, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any condition, or acts other than those proceedings, conditions, or acts which are specifically required therefor hereunder or under any applicable bond act, and the validity of and security for any bonds issued by the agency pursuant to this chapter, and any local governmental obligations issued in accordance herewith, shall not be affected by the existence or nonexistence of any consent or other proceedings, conditions, or acts. Nothing in this chapter shall exempt the agency from the provisions of chapter 10.1 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-15.
Bonds not obligations of the state.

Bonds issued by the agency under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to be a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any of its political subdivisions, but shall be payable solely from the revenues, funds, assets, and other property of the agency from which they are made payable pursuant to this chapter. Bonds issued by the agency under the provisions of this chapter shall recite that neither the state nor any political subdivision thereof shall be obligated to pay the bonds, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds. Further, every bond shall recite whether it is a general obligation of the agency, or a special obligation thereof payable solely from particular revenues, funds, assets, or other property pledged to its payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-16.
Lien status recording.

Notwithstanding any provision of any other law, including the Uniform Commercial Code:

Any pledge or assignment of revenues of any kind, funds, loan agreements, local governmental obligations, obligations of private water companies, property, or assets made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter by the agency, any local governmental unit, or any privately organized water supplier hereunder, shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise, whether or not the parties have notice thereof, and shall be deemed continuously perfected from the time it is made;

No filing of any kind with respect to a pledge or assignment need be made under the Uniform Commercial Code, or otherwise;

Unless otherwise provided in the loan agreement, a pledge of revenues of any kind shall be deemed to include a pledge of any accounts or general intangibles from which the pledged revenues are derived, whether existing at the time of the pledge or thereafter coming into existence, and whether held at the time of the pledge or thereafter acquired by the agency, local governmental unit or privately organized water supplier, and the proceeds of the accounts or general intangibles; and

The pledge of revenues of any kind, accounts, and general intangibles shall be subject to the lien of the pledge without delivery or segregation, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of contract or tort or otherwise against the agency or local governmental unit.

A pledge of revenues of any kind under this chapter shall constitute a sufficient appropriation thereof for the purposes of any provision for appropriation, and the revenues may be applied as required by the pledge without further appropriation.

For the purposes of this section the word “pledge” shall be construed to include the grant of a security interest under the Uniform Commercial Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-17.
Bonds and local government obligations as investment securities.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter or any recitals in any bonds or local governmental obligations issued hereunder, all bonds and local governmental obligations shall be deemed to be investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-18.
Proceeds received by agency as trust funds.

All money received by the agency pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the issue of bonds or as revenues or otherwise, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-19.
Tax exemption.

Bonds issued by the agency and local governmental obligations issued by any local governmental unit in accordance with this chapter, their transfer, and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by and within the state. The agency shall not be required to pay any taxes, assessments, or excises upon its income, existence, operation, or property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-20.
Duration of agency — Termination.

The agency and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law; provided, however, that no such law shall take effect so long as the agency shall have the bonds outstanding in accordance with this chapter, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment or satisfaction thereof. Upon termination of the agency, the title to all funds and other properties owned by it, which remain after provision for payment or satisfaction of all bonds of the agency, shall vest in the state. The obligations, debts, and liabilities of the agency shall be assumed by and imposed upon the state, and shall be transferred to the general treasurer or to such other successor as the general assembly may designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-21.
Record keeping financial statements.

The agency shall, at all times, keep full and accurate accounts of its receipts, expenditures, disbursements, assets, and liabilities with respect to the agency’s administration of the safe drinking water revolving loan fund which shall be open to inspection by any officer or duly appointed agent of the state. The agency shall submit an annual report, in writing, to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate. The report shall include financial statements relating to the operations, properties, and expenditures of the agency with respect to the agency’s administration of the safe drinking water revolving loan fund maintained in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, so far as applicable, and audited by an independent certified public accounting firm.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 149.

46-12.8-22.
Supplemental powers — Inconsistent laws.

The provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative, and complete method for accomplishing the purposes of this chapter, and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to, and not in derogation of, powers conferred upon the agency, the department, local governmental units and private water companies by other laws; provided, however, that insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, municipal charter, administrative order or regulation, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling. Any amounts appropriated by this chapter to the agency or the department shall be in addition to any other amounts appropriated to the agency or the department by any other law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-23.
Compliance with federal law.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, the provisions of this chapter are limited to the extent required by applicable federal law, as in effect from time to time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-24.
Severability — Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any provision hereof shall be held invalid in any circumstances, any invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or circumstances. This chapter shall be construed in all respects so as to meet any constitutional requirements. In carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, all steps shall be taken which are necessary to meet constitutional requirements. This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its purpose and legislative findings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.